Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201685-423
State College Facilities Program of 2006; created; use of appropriations.

The State College Facilities Program of 2006 is created. All funds appropriated to the program by the Legislature shall be used exclusively for deferred maintenance, repair, renovation, and facility replacement construction projects authorized pursuant to section 85-424.

Laws 2006, LB 605, § 5;

Laws 2016, LB957, § 18.
March 31, 2016